Washington statutes.
RCW 17.24.151

Violations—Costs of control.

A person who, through a knowing and willful violation of a quarantine established under this chapter, causes an infestation to become established, may be required to pay the costs of public control or eradication measures caused as a result of that violation.

[ 1991 c 257 s 19.]